test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_spaha_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - spaha: # not checked
    spaha+N+Sg+Nom: spaha
    spaha+N+Sg+Gen: spaˊṿa    		
    spaha+N+Sg+Acc: spaˊṿa
    spaha+N+Sg+Ill: spaˊhan
    spaha+N+Sg+Loc: spavvaast
    spaha+N+Sg+Com: spavvain
    spaha+N+Sg+Abe: spaˊṿattáá
    spaha+N+Ess: spahhaan		
    spaha+N+Par: spahhaad	
    spaha+N+Pl+Nom: spaˊṿah		
    spaha+N+Pl+Gen: spaˊṿai
    spaha+N+Pl+Acc: spaˊṿaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Ill: spavvaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Loc: spaˊṿain
    spaha+N+Pl+Com: spaˊṿaiguin
    spaha+N+Pl+Abe: spaˊṿaittáá
